District of Columbia statutes.
20-305

Complaint to contest the validity of a will.

Except as provided in section 20-353(b) , any person may file a verified complaint to contest the validity of a will within 6 months following notice by publication of the appointment or reappointment of a personal representative under section 20-704 . The person filing the complaint shall give notice to all interested persons.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(k), 42 DCR 63
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.
1981 Ed., § 20-305.
This section is referenced in § 20-331.